Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-401.01
Domestic property and casualty insurance companies; loss reserves.

Loss reserves for domestic property and casualty insurance companies shall be set at the present value of estimated future payments if (1) a complete settlement between the claimant and the insured or insurer has been agreed upon, (2) all payments due the claimant have not yet been made, and (3) the payments are structured as an annuity.

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 118.